Hawaii statutes.
§150A-4.5 Pest inspection, quarantine, and
eradication fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the pest
inspection, quarantine, and eradication fund, into which shall be deposited:

(1) Legislative appropriations for biosecurity and
inspection, quarantine, and eradication services;

(2) Service fees, charges, and penalties collected
under section 150A-5.3;

(3) Fees imposed for services pursuant to this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter;

(4) Fines for violations of this chapter;

(5) Federal funds received for biosecurity, pest
inspection, control, management, quarantine, and eradication programs;

(6) Grants and gifts;

(7) All interest earned or accrued on moneys
deposited in the fund; and

(8) Any other moneys made available to the fund.

(b) The moneys in the pest inspection,
quarantine, and eradication fund shall be expended by the department for the operation
of biosecurity and pest inspection, quarantine, eradication, and monitoring
programs; the electronic importer manifest program; related facilities; the
execution of emergency remedial measures when pests are detected in the course
of inspection and quarantine activities by the department; training of
inspectors; education of the agricultural industry, permit and certificate
holders, and the general public as to import requirements; and for any other
purposes deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. In
addition, the moneys shall be expended to facilitate the processing and
issuance of permits and microorganism import documents and for the operations,
activities, and monitoring of permitted and certified plants, animals, and
microorganisms. [L Sp 2007, c 9, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 236, §5; am L 2010, c
173, §4; am L 2012, c 127, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next